Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1296.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 38, chapter 4, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 38-659, to read: START_STATUTE38-659. Private employers; natural persons; state health care plan; rules A. Private employers and natural persons who are not employed by this state may participate in this state's health care plans. B. The department of administration may adopt rules to implement this section. END_STATUTE